Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 211

Classification for Tax Purposes

48-211-101. LLC classification.

For purposes of all state and local Tennessee taxes, a foreign or domestic LLC shall be treated as a partnership or an association taxable as a corporation as such classification is determined for federal income tax purposes. The members of a foreign LLC treated as a partnership are subject to all state and local Tennessee taxes in the same manner and extent as partners in a foreign partnership. The members of a domestic LLC are subject to all state and local Tennessee taxes in the same manner and extent as partners in a domestic partnership.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Key Tax Aspects of the Tennessee Limited Liability Company Act (Andrhe Sophia Blumstein), 30 Tenn. B.J. 14 (1994).

Where There's a Will: The 95% family-owned test for family limited partnerships (Dan Holbrook), 37 Tenn. B.J. 31 (2001).

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability of corporate campaign contribution prohibitions to limited liability companies, OAG 98-053, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 53 (3/2/98).